Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.410.300

Review of district and educator workforce data.

Beginning with the 2010 school year and annually thereafter, each educational service district, in cooperation with the professional educator standards board, must convene representatives from school districts within that region and professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation programs to review district and regional educator workforce data, make biennial projections of certificate staffing needs, and identify how recruitment and enrollment plans in educator preparation programs reflect projected need.

[ 2010 c 235 s 506.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.